New York, session 2025-2026, S4116.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The metropolitan transportation authority shall conduct a 2 study to examine the feasibility and impact of the installation of slid- 3 ing access doors upon platforms at subway facilities operated by such 4 authority including, but not limited to the following issues: 5 (a) increased benefits to the safety of customers; 6 (b) the likelihood of fatality prevention; and 7 (c) the fiscal impact of installation. 8 § 2. Within one year of the effective date of this act, the chairman 9 of the metropolitan transportation authority shall submit a written 10 report to the governor, temporary president of the senate, speaker of 11 the assembly and mayor of the city of New York, with the findings and 12 recommendations of the study conducted pursuant to section one of this 13 act. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05465-01-5